District of Columbia statutes.
38-918

Written procedures for evaluating facilities needs.

The District of Columbia Public Schools shall develop and submit for Council approval by November 1, 1997, written procedures outlining an ongoing process for evaluating facilities needs, to include:

(1)

Annual community input and deliberations; and

(2)

Annual demographic projections based on census, economic development (which shall include housing starts), and other factors.

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1301, 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 31-2218.
Section 1301 of D.C. Law 12-59 added § 31-2218 [1981 Ed.].
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.
For temporary addition of section, see § 1301 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and § 1301 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Section 2002 of D.C. Act 12-152 provided for the application of the act.
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.